California statutes. Education Code
(A) Litigation, to which the student body organization is a party, has been initiated formally.

(B) A point has been reached where, in the opinion of the legislative
 body on the advice of its legal counsel, based on existing facts and circumstances, there is a significant exposure to litigation against the student body organization.

(C) Based on existing facts and circumstances, the legislative body is meeting only to decide whether a closed session is authorized pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(D) Based on existing facts and circumstances, the legislative body has decided to initiate, or is deciding whether to initiate, litigation.

(5) For purposes of subparagraphs (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (4), “existing facts and circumstances” shall consist only of one of the following:

(A) Facts and circumstances that might
 result in litigation against the student body organization, but which the organization believes are not yet known to a potential plaintiff or plaintiffs, which facts and circumstances need not be disclosed.

(B) Facts and circumstances, including, but not necessarily limited to, an accident, disaster, incident, or transactional occurrence, that might result in litigation against the student body organization and that are known to a potential plaintiff or plaintiffs, which facts or circumstances shall be publicly stated on the agenda or announced.

(C) The receipt of a claim pursuant to the Government Claims Act (Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code) or some other written communication from a potential plaintiff threatening litigation.

(D) A statement made by a person in an open and public meeting threatening litigation on a specific matter within the responsibility of the legislative body.

(E) A statement threatening litigation made by a person outside an open and public meeting on a specific matter within the responsibility of the legislative body, so long as the official or employee of the student body organization receiving knowledge of the threat makes a contemporaneous or other record of the statement prior to the meeting. The records so created need not identify the alleged victim of unlawful or tortious sexual conduct or anyone making the threat on their behalf, or identify a public employee who is the alleged perpetrator of any unlawful or tortious conduct upon which a threat of litigation is based,
 unless the identity of the person has been publicly disclosed.

(6) Nothing in this section shall require disclosure of written communications that are privileged and not subject to disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(7) Prior to holding a closed session pursuant to this section, the legislative body shall state on the agenda or publicly announce and identify the provision of this section that authorizes the closed session. If the session is closed pursuant to paragraph (1), the legislative body shall state the title of or otherwise specifically identify the litigation to be discussed, unless the legislative body states that to do so would jeopardize the ability of the
 student body organization to effectuate service of process upon one or more unserved parties, or that to do so would jeopardize its ability to conclude existing settlement negotiations to its advantage.

(8) For purposes of this subdivision, a student body organization shall be considered to be a “party” or to have a “significant exposure to litigation” if an officer or employee of the student body organization is a party or has significant exposure to litigation concerning prior or prospective activities or alleged activities during the course and scope of that office or employment, including litigation in which it is an issue whether an activity is outside the course and scope of the office or employment.

(c) (1) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed
 to prevent a legislative body from holding closed sessions with the Attorney General, district attorney, sheriff, or chief of police, or their respective deputies, on matters posing a threat to the security of public buildings or a threat to the public’s right of access to public services or public facilities, or from holding closed sessions during a regular or special meeting to consider the appointment, employment, evaluation of performance, discipline, or dismissal of an employee of the student body organization or to hear complaints or charges brought against the employee by another person or employee unless the employee requests a public session.

(2) As a condition to holding a closed session on specific complaints or charges brought against an employee by another person or employee, the employee shall be given written notice of the
 employee’s right to have the complaints or charges heard in an open session rather than a closed session, which notice shall be delivered to the employee personally or by mail at least 24 hours before the time for holding the session. If notice is not given, any disciplinary or other action taken by the legislative body against the employee based on the specific complaints or charges in the closed session shall be null and void.

(3) A legislative body also may exclude from the public or closed meeting, during the examination of a witness, any or all other witnesses in the matter being investigated by the legislative body.

(4) For the purposes of this subdivision, the term “employee” shall include an officer or an independent contractor who functions as an officer or an
 employee of the student body organization, but shall not include any elected official, member of a legislative body, or other independent contractor. Closed sessions held pursuant to this section shall not include discussion or action on proposed compensation except for a reduction of compensation that results from the imposition of discipline.

(d) (1) A legislative body shall publicly report any action taken in closed session and the vote or abstention of every member present thereon, as follows:

(A) Approval of an agreement concluding real property negotiations pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be reported after the agreement is final, as follows:

(i) If its own approval renders the agreement final,
 the legislative body board or subboard shall report that approval and the substance of the agreement in open session at the public meeting during which the closed session is held.

(ii) If final approval rests with the other party to the negotiations, the legislative body shall disclose the fact of that approval and the substance of the agreement upon inquiry by any person, as soon as the other party or its agent has informed the legislative body of its approval.

(B) Approval given to its legal counsel to defend, or seek or refrain from seeking appellate review or relief, or to enter as an amicus curiae in any form of litigation, as the result of a consultation under subdivision (b) shall be reported in open session at the public meeting during which the closed session is held.
 The report shall identify, if known, the adverse party or parties and the substance of the litigation. In the case of approval given to initiate or intervene in an action, the announcement need not identify the action, the defendants, or other particulars, but shall specify that the direction to initiate or intervene in an action has been given and that the action, the defendants, and the other particulars shall, once formally commenced, be disclosed to any person upon inquiry, unless to do so would jeopardize the ability of the student body organization to effectuate service of process on one or more unserved parties, or that to do so would jeopardize its ability to conclude existing settlement negotiations to its advantage.

(C) Approval given to its legal counsel of a settlement of pending litigation, as defined in subdivision (b), at
 any stage prior to or during a judicial or quasi-judicial proceeding shall be reported after the settlement is final, as follows:

(i) If a legislative body accepts a settlement offer signed by the opposing party, the legislative body shall report its acceptance and identify the substance of the agreement in open session at the public meeting during which the closed session is held.

(ii) If final approval rests with some other party to the litigation or with the court, then, as soon as the settlement becomes final, and upon inquiry by any person, the legislative body shall disclose the fact of that approval and identify the substance of the agreement.

(D) Action taken to appoint, employ, dismiss, accept the resignation
 of, or otherwise affect the employment status of an employee of the employee organization in closed session pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be reported at the public meeting during which the closed session is held. Any report required by this subparagraph shall identify the title of the employee’s position. Notwithstanding the general requirement of this subparagraph, the report of a dismissal or of the nonrenewal of an employment contract shall be deferred until the first public meeting following the exhaustion of administrative remedies, if any.

(E) Approval of an agreement concluding labor negotiations with represented employees pursuant to subdivision (e) shall be reported after the agreement is final and has been accepted or ratified by the other party. The report shall identify the item approved and the other party or parties to the
 negotiation.

(2) Reports that are required to be made pursuant to this subdivision may be made orally or in writing. A legislative body shall provide to any person who has submitted a written request to the legislative body within 24 hours of the posting of the agenda, or to any person who has made a standing request for all documentation as part of a request for notice of meetings pursuant to Section 89306.5, if the requester is present at the time the closed session ends, copies of any contracts, settlement agreements, or other documents that were finally approved or adopted in the closed session. If the action taken results in one or more substantive amendments to the related documents requiring retyping, the documents need not be released until the retyping is completed during normal business hours, provided that the presiding
 officer of the legislative body, or the presiding officer’s designee, orally summarizes the substance of the amendments for the benefit of the document requester or any other person present and requesting the information.

(3) The documentation referred to in paragraph (2) shall be available to any person on the next business day following the meeting in which the action referred to is taken or, in the case of substantial amendments, when any necessary retyping is complete.

(4) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require that a legislative body approve actions not otherwise subject to the approval of that legislative body.

(5) No action for injury to a reputational, liberty, or other personal interest may
 be commenced by or on behalf of any employee or former employee with respect to whom a disclosure is made by a legislative body in an effort to comply with this subdivision.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a legislative body may hold closed sessions with the designated representative of the student body organization regarding the salaries, salary schedules, or compensation paid in the form of fringe benefits of its represented and unrepresented employees, and, for represented employees, any other matter within the statutorily provided scope of representation. However, prior to the closed session, the legislative body shall hold an open and public session in which it identifies its designated representatives.

(2) (A) Closed sessions of a legislative body, as permitted in this subdivision, shall be for the purpose of reviewing its position and instructing the designated representative of the student body organization.

(B) Closed sessions, as permitted in this subdivision, may take place prior to and during consultations and discussions with representatives of employee organizations and unrepresented employees.

(C) Closed sessions with the designated representative of the student body organization regarding the salaries, salary schedules, or compensation paid in the form of fringe benefits may include discussion of the available funds and funding priorities of the student body organization, but only insofar as these discussions relate to providing instructions to the
 designated representative of the student body organization.

(D) Closed sessions held pursuant to this subdivision shall not include final action on the proposed compensation of one or more unrepresented employees.

(E) For the purposes enumerated in this subdivision, a legislative body may also meet with a state conciliator who has intervened in the proceedings.

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, the term “employee” includes an officer or an independent contractor who functions as an officer or an employee of the student body organization, but shall not include any elected official, member of a legislative body, or other independent contractors.

(f) (1) Prior to holding any closed session, the legislative body shall disclose, in an open meeting, the item or items to be discussed in the closed session. The disclosure may take the form of a reference to the item or items as they are listed by number or letter on the agenda. In the closed session, the legislative body may consider only those matters covered in its statement. Nothing in this subdivision shall require or authorize a disclosure of information prohibited by state or federal law.

(2) After any closed session, the legislative body shall reconvene into open session prior to adjournment, and shall make any disclosures required by subdivision (d) of action taken in the closed session.

(3) The disclosure required to be made in open session
 pursuant to this subdivision may be made at the location announced in the agenda for the closed session, as long as the public is allowed to be present at that location for the purpose of hearing the announcements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 81.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

89307.1.

In the event that any meeting is willfully interrupted by a group or groups of persons so as to render the orderly conduct of that meeting unfeasible, and order cannot be restored by the removal of individuals who are willfully interrupting the meeting, the members of the legislative body conducting the meeting may order the meeting room cleared and continue in session. Only matters appearing on the agenda may be considered in that session. Representatives of the press or other news media, except those participating in the disturbance, shall be allowed to attend any session held pursuant to this section. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the legislative body from establishing a procedure for readmitting an individual or individuals not responsible for willfully disturbing the orderly conduct of the meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

89307.2.

(a) A legislative body shall not conduct a meeting in a facility that prohibits the admittance of any person, or persons, on the basis of race, religious creed, color, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression, or that is inaccessible to disabled persons, or where members of the public may not be present without making a payment or purchase. This section shall apply to every legislative body as defined in Section 89305.1.

(b) A notice,
 agenda, announcement, or report required under this article need not identify any victim or alleged victim of tortious sexual conduct or child abuse unless the identity of the person has been publicly disclosed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 637, Sec. 11.   (AB 620)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

89307.4.

Each member of a legislative body who attends a meeting of that legislative body where an action is taken in violation of any provision of this article, with knowledge that the meeting is in violation of this article, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Travel Expenses [89310. - 89310.]

89310.

The trustees may authorize the allowance of actual and necessary traveling expenses to students to participate in the study of matters relating to education at the California State University or in activities that, in the judgment of the president of a particular campus, are integrally related to its formal instructional offerings. Traveling expenses shall not be allowed with respect to student lobbyists or representatives in Sacramento.

 Section 11032 of the Government Code does not apply to allowances authorized by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 265.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Accommodation of Religious Creed [89320. - 89320.]

89320.

(a) The Trustees of the California State University shall require each state university, in administering any test or examination, to permit any student who is eligible to undergo the test or examination to do so, without penalty, at a time when that activity would not violate the student’s religious creed. This requirement shall not apply if administering the test or examination at an alternate time would impose an undue hardship that could not reasonably have been avoided. In any court proceeding in which the existence of an undue hardship that could not reasonably have been avoided is an issue, the burden of proof shall be upon the institution.

(b) As used in this section, “undue
 hardship” means an action requiring significant difficulty or expense, when considered in light of the following factors:

(1) The nature and cost of the accommodation needed.

(2) The overall financial resources of the facilities involved in the provision of the reasonable accommodations, the number of persons employed at the facility, and the effect on expenses and resources or the impact otherwise of these accommodations upon the operation of the facility.

(3) The overall financial resources of the covered entity, the overall size of the business of a covered entity with respect to the number of employees,
 and the number, type, and location of its facilities.

(4) The type of operations, including the composition, structure, and functions of the workforce of the entity.

(5) The geographic separateness, administrative, or fiscal relationship of the facility or facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 613, Sec. 1.   (AB 668)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Program for California Residents 60 Years of Age or Older [89330. - 89333.]

89330.

The Trustees of the California State University may authorize at any of the institutions of the California State University the establishment of a program which allows persons 60 years of age or older to enroll in regular credit courses without requiring the payment of the application for admission fee and regular session registration fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 121.)
-------------------------------------------

89331.

Each program established pursuant to this article shall be maintained in accordance with the following standards:

(a) Enrollment shall be limited to qualified persons who are residents, as defined by Section 68017, and are 60 years of age or older on the residence determination date.

(b) Persons enrolling in the program shall be registered last, after regular students have been registered for classes.

(c) No special classes limited to, or designed particularly for, senior citizens shall be established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 246.)
-------------------------------------------

89332.

Fee waivers authorized pursuant to this article shall not be in place of fee waivers for disadvantaged students.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 246.)
-------------------------------------------

89333.

The Trustees of the California State University shall adopt regulations for the effective administration of this article. The Trustees of the California State University shall phase in programs under this article over not less than a three-year period commencing January 1, 1980, except that existing programs may be continued as programs under this article on and after its effective date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 122.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Higher Education Outreach and Assistance Act for Foster Youth [89340. - 89348.]

89340.

This article shall be known, and may be cited as the Higher Education Outreach and Assistance Act for Foster Youth.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 763, Sec. 2.   (AB 1567)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

89341.

(a) The Legislature makes the following findings and declarations:

(1) Children who live in foster care are abused and neglected individuals for whom the state has assumed parental responsibility. Although foster care is designed to reunite those children, when appropriate, with their parents, or to place those children with an adoptive family, many children are neither reunited with their parents nor adopted. When those children reach the age of 18 years, the state terminates its responsibility. Given that, it is important that these youth have access to postsecondary education, including career technical education during their time in foster care
 to ensure their long-term economic security.

(2) In California, there are more than 60,000 children and youth in foster care, and approximately 8,000 are college-aged, between 18 and 21 years of age.

(3) While 40 percent of foster youth will enroll in college by 19 years of age, their rate of persistence and degree completion is lower than the general population. Just one in five foster youth will successfully complete 30 or more units. By 26 years of age, 8 percent of foster youth will have earned an associate’s degree or higher, compared to 46 percent of the general population. One of the critical hurdles for this student population to overcome is finding the financial resources to fund their education. Only 9 percent of foster youth receive the Cal Grant, California’s need-based
 financial aid award.

(4) Emancipated foster youth, who do not have parents to rely
 upon for support and guidance, suffer unique disadvantages compared to other students. While many students are preoccupied with academic pressures, the primary concerns cited by former foster youth are the absence of family support and the fear of spending the holidays alone. Emancipated foster youth need emotional support and specialized resources from sensitive university staff who understand the unusual circumstances and pressing needs of emancipated foster youth.

(b) Accordingly, the Legislature states its intent that the Trustees of the California State University and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges expand the access and retention programs of the university and the community colleges to include the following:

(1) Outreach
 services to foster youth to encourage their enrollment in a state university or a community college.

(2) Technical assistance to foster youth to assist those prospective students in completing admission applications and financial aid applications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 763, Sec. 3.   (AB 1567)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

89342.

The Trustees of the California State University and Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall perform the following services to assist foster youth:

(a) Review housing issues for those foster youth living in college dormitories to ensure basic housing during the regular academic school year, including vacations and holidays other than summer break.

(b) Provide technical assistance and advice to campuses on ways in which to improve the delivery of services to foster youth.

(c) Commencing in the 1998–99 academic year, track the retention
 rates of students who voluntarily disclose to the university or community college their status as foster youth.

(d) For purposes of this article, “foster youth” includes former foster youth, and means a person in California whose dependency was established or continued by the court on or after the youth’s 16th birthday and who is no older than 25 years of age at the commencement of the academic year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 763, Sec. 4.   (AB 1567)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

89343.

The Trustees of the California State University and Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall evaluate the extent to which their current programs are meeting the needs of foster youth and how those outreach and retention services can be improved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

89344.

Representation on the appropriate California State University Advisory Councils shall be expanded to include at least one foster youth who is either a current or former student at the university.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 763, Sec. 5.   (AB 1567)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

89345.

The State University Educational Opportunity Program and California Community College Extended Opportunity Programs and Services shall ensure that identified foster youth are informed of services, including mentoring, provided by these programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 763, Sec. 6.   (AB 1567)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

89346.

(a) The State Department of Social Services and county welfare departments shall, in coordination with the California State University and the California Community Colleges, do both of the following:

 (1) Communicate with foster youth at two grade levels designated jointly by the California State University and the California Community Colleges in order to facilitate the outreach and technical assistance efforts for those prospective students.

(2) Coordinate with staff of the California State University Educational Opportunity Program, the California Community Colleges Extended Opportunity Programs and Services, or Cooperating Agencies Foster Youth Educational Support, as appropriate, to verify eligibility of foster youth for participation in programs and other benefits.

(b) (1) Each campus of the California Community Colleges shall do all of the following upon admission of a foster youth, and each campus of the California State University shall do all of the following upon determination, through receipt of the Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) or through another means, that a student enrolled
 at, or applying to, that campus is a current or former foster youth and is eligible for financial aid:

(A) Notify that student about appropriate campus support programs that may include, but are not necessarily limited to, the California State University Educational Opportunity Program, the California Community Colleges Extended Opportunity Programs and Services, and Cooperating Agencies Foster Youth Educational Support.

(B) Notify that student of his or her eligibility for financial aid.

(C) Provide that student with instructions for accessing the benefits for which he or she has qualified.

(2) Notification of students pursuant to this subdivision may be accomplished
 by methods that shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, inclusion of information in the letters of acceptance sent to foster youth who have been admitted to those campuses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 763, Sec. 7.   (AB 1567)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

89347.

The Student Aid Commission shall provide outreach services and technical assistance to foster youth at the two grade levels designated jointly by the California State University and the California Community Colleges. The State Department of Social Services and county welfare departments shall, in coordination with the Student Aid Commission, communicate with foster youth at the two grade levels designated jointly by the California State University and the California Community Colleges in order to facilitate the Student Aid Commission’s outreach and technical assistance efforts for those prospective students.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1129, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

89348.

(a) Subject to the availability of funds in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University shall provide each participating campus with funding to support postsecondary education programs for foster youth and former foster youth. The chancellor’s office shall develop a funding formula that allocates funding to each campus that offers a foster youth support program. The formula may authorize each participating campus to maintain a minimum baseline funding amount. The formula shall be based on the number of students participating in the program at each participating campus.

(b) Funding allocated to each campus pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be used to support services for students who are
 foster youth and former foster youth, which may include, but are not limited to, outreach and recruitment, consultation and eligibility verification, consultation and referrals for students deemed ineligible, service coordination, counseling and academic advising, grants for books, supplies, tutoring, childcare, housing, or transportation, independent living and financial literacy skills support, frequent in-person contact, career guidance, referrals to health services, mental health services, housing assistance, and other related services, and direct financial support.

(c) A campus program may provide all services described in subdivision (b) to an enrolled student who is a foster youth or former foster youth but whose courses have not yet commenced, if those services are necessary to enable the student to be successful upon the commencement of the academic term. Funding may also be used to support these services during the summer term for
 those students who are enrolled in the upcoming fall term.

(d) Each participating campus shall offer all of the following as part of its program provided pursuant to this section:

(1) A full-time designated staff program director or coordinator with experience relevant to working with foster youth and former foster youth.

(2) Campus office and meeting space.

(3) A range of student supports to address academic and nonacademic needs.

(4) Opportunities for peer mentors.

(e) To the extent possible, services provided under this section, including those provided pursuant to subdivision (d), shall supplement, and shall not supplant,
 other services provided by the state, a county, or a campus. Where existing targeted programs for foster youth and former foster youth exist on campus, funding shall be used to continue and expand these programs.

(f) Commencing March 31, 2024, and every two years thereafter, the chancellor’s office shall submit a report to the Department of Finance and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee describing all of the following:

(1) Efforts during the previous academic year to serve students who are foster youth and former foster youth, including uses of the funding allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) and uses of other internal and external resources supporting foster youth services.

(2) Enrollment, retention, and completion rate data for students who are foster youth and former foster youth and participated in programs
 funded pursuant to this section on a campus-by-campus basis, and other metrics as appropriate.

(3) As feasible, systemwide data on enrollment, retention, and completion rates for students who are foster youth and former foster youth and participated in programs funded pursuant to this section, and other metrics as appropriate, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 43.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Child Development Centers [89400. - 89413.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [89400. - 89404.]

89400.

The Trustees of the California State University and any other public or private nonprofit agency may contract with the State Department of Education to establish and maintain a child development center on or near each state university campus pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 123.)
-------------------------------------------

89401.

The trustees and any other public or private nonprofit agency may contract with the Department of Education to establish and maintain such campus childdevelopment centers. Such operating agencies may accept student fees, parent fees, and private funds to operate child development centers and may be reimbursed for eligible costs pursuant to Sections 16708 and 16780.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89402.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, children under two years of age whose parent or parents are students may attend child development centers consistent with the priorities established.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89404.

Each child development center maintained pursuant to Section 89400 shall have an advisory council, composed of representatives of the parent-users and persons from fields related to the well-being of children.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. San Francisco State University [89410. - 89413.]

89410.

The San Francisco State University may maintain a child care center as an integral part of the state university. The center shall be used for observation, demonstration, study, student experience, and student teaching.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

89411.

The trustees shall determine the fee which the state university shall charge the parents or guardian of any child admitted to the center. All fees shall be used to reimburse the state university for the cost of operating and maintaining the center.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89412.

No child shall be admitted to the center unless he meets the requirements for admittance to a child development center.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89413.

The budget for the center may be prepared and submitted to the trustees with the budget of the state university.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.4. Center To Close Achievement Gaps [89420. - 89426.]

89420.

The Center to Close Achievement Gaps is hereby established, to be located at a campus in the California State University system to be chosen by the Chancellor of the California State University, or at the office of the chancellor. If considering a campus for the location of the center, the chancellor shall use all of the following criteria in choosing the campus:

(a) Its graduation rates for both undergraduate programs and programs of professional preparation of educators.

(b) Its capacity to establish and maintain the center.

(c) Its capacity to operate in partnership with the State Department of Education, the State Board of Education,
 the California Collaborative for Education Excellence, each county office of education engaged in assisting schools as part of the statewide system of support, established pursuant to Section 52059.5, and the University of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 24.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

89422.

The mission of the center is to provide resources and assistance to local educational agencies in order to eliminate gaps in academic achievement between subgroups of pupils enrolled in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, as identified on the California School Dashboard, pursuant to Section 52064.5, through both of the following:

(a) Providing professional preparation of educators in the California State University system.

(b) Serving as a resource for local educational agencies on strategies for closing achievement gaps.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 24.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

89424.

(a) The center shall seek to fulfill its mission and improve the capacity of teachers, education specialists, and school administrators to close gaps in academic achievement through both of the following:

(1) Strengthening professional preparation on effective instructional practices, effective school leadership practices, effective local educational agency leadership practices, and the use of data and continuous improvement strategies.

(2) Serving local educational agencies as a clearinghouse for evidence-based strategies and promising practices for closing academic achievement gaps.

(b) In addition to its duties
 pursuant to subdivision (a), the center shall also do all of the following:

(1) Engage in and disseminate research on evidence-based strategies and promising practices to close academic achievement gaps.

(2) Develop and disseminate tools and resources to implement evidence-based strategies for closing academic achievement gaps.

(3) Document and promote effective practices used in higher performing, high-poverty schools and local educational agencies.

(c) The center shall operate in partnership with the State Department of Education, the State Board of Education, the California Collaborative for Education Excellence, each county office of education engaged in assisting schools as part of the statewide system of support, established pursuant to Section
 52059.5, and the University of California.

(d) (1) On or before January 30 of the year following the first full year of operation, and on or before January 30 annually thereafter, the center shall submit to the Legislature a report prepared by a third party evaluating the support provided to local educational agencies by the center during the previous year.

(2) The report specified in paragraph (1) shall be submitted pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) The center shall be established no later than one year after an appropriation is made for the purposes of this section by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 53, Sec. 24.   (SB 77)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

89426.

(a) The provisions of this chapter shall be operative only upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or in another statute for this purpose.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.